Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 27 Psychology and Behavior Analysts
§ 33-27-122.
Board hearings and investigations.

The board may investigate or cause to be investigated any allegation or evidence that appears to show that a psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst licensed to practice in this jurisdiction, and anyone under his supervision is, or may be, in violation of this act or of any of the rules adopted by the board.

Any person who in good faith reports a violation to the board shall be absolutely immune from civil liability for any statement or opinion made in the report.

The board shall conduct hearings in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and duly promulgated rules and regulations.

The licensee may waive any or all of his rights to a formal adjudicatory proceeding.

The board may conduct a default hearing if, after due notice, the individual fails or refuses to appear. The board shall have the authority to issue subpoenas for production of documents and witnesses and to administer oaths. The board may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to compel compliance with a subpoena.

A psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst may surrender his license when he is charged with any violation of this act or board rules and regulations, and such surrender and acceptance by the board shall constitute acknowledgment by the person as an admission of guilt as charged. The circumstances of the surrender shall be reported in the same fashion as a revocation action.

A psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst may request in writing to the board that a restriction be placed upon his license to practice. The board, in its discretion, may accept a surrender or grant a request for restriction and shall have the authority to attach restrictions to the license to practice within this state or otherwise to discipline the licensee.

Subsequent to the holding of a hearing and the taking of evidence by the board as provided for in this section, if a majority of the board finds that a psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst is in violation of this act or guilty of any of the acts, offenses or conditions as enumerated by the board, the following actions may be taken:

The board may revoke or suspend the license;

The board may suspend imposition of a revocation or suspension of a license;

The board may impose revocation or suspension of a license, but suspend enforcement thereof by placing the psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst on probation, which probation shall be revocable if the board finds the conditions of the probation order are not being followed. As a condition of probation the board may require the psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst to submit to care, counseling or treatment by a professional designated by the board. The expense of the action shall be borne by the probationer. The board may at any time modify the conditions of the probation and may include among them any reasonable condition for the purpose of the protection of the public, or for the purpose of the rehabilitation of the probationer, or both;

The board may require restitution when necessary; and

The board may assess the costs of the disciplinary proceeding as specified in its rules and regulations.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1; 2009, ch. 154, § 1; 2022 ch. 47, § 2, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “or school psychologist” following “a psychologist” or variants in (a), (f), (g), and (h); substituted “refuses to appear” for “refused to appear” in the first sentence of (e); and substituted “any violation of this act or board rules and regulations” for “unethical conduct” in the first sentence of (f).

The 2022 amendment

added “, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst” following “psychologist” throughout the section; and deleted “and regulations” following “of the rules” in (a).

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Wyoming Administrative Procedures Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-27-113(a)(x).

§ 33-27-123.
Privileged communication.

In judicial proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or juvenile, in legislative and administrative proceedings, and in proceedings preliminary and ancillary thereto, a patient or client, or his guardian or personal representative, may refuse to disclose or prevent the disclosure of confidential information, including information contained in administrative records, communicated to a person licensed or otherwise authorized to practice under this act, or to persons reasonably believed by the patient or client to be so licensed, and their agents, for the purpose of diagnosis, evaluation or treatment of any mental or emotional condition or disorder. The psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst shall not disclose any information communicated as described above in the absence of an express waiver of the privilege except in the following circumstances:

Where abuse or harmful neglect of children, the elderly or disabled or incompetent individuals is known or reasonably suspected;

Where the validity of a will of a former patient or client is contested;

Where such information is necessary for the psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst to defend against a malpractice action brought by the patient or client;

Where an immediate threat of physical violence against a readily identifiable victim is disclosed to the psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst;

In the context of civil commitment proceedings, where an immediate threat of self-inflicted damage is disclosed to the psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst;

Where the patient or client, by alleging mental or emotional damages in litigation, puts his mental state in issue and production of those materials by the patient or client is required by law;

Where the patient or client is examined pursuant to court order; or

In the context of investigations and hearings brought by the patient or client and conducted by the board where violations of this act are at issue. Information that is deemed to be of sensitive nature shall be inspected by the board in camera and the board shall determine whether or not the information shall become a part of the record and subject to public disclosure.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1; 2009, ch. 154, § 1; 2022 ch. 47, § 2, effective March 9, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to privileged communication by a licensed or certified mental health professional, see §

33-38-113

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “or school psychologist” following “psychologist” throughout the section.

The 2022 amendment

“, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst” following “psychologist” throughout (a).

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-27-113(a)(x).

Substance abuse treatment records. —

On their face, the privileges protect confidential information communicated by a patient to her treatment provider for the purpose of diagnosis, evaluation or treatment of any mental or emotional condition or disorder unless the patient alleges mental or emotional damages in litigation; plaintiff’s substance abuse treatment records were not privileged under the exceptions contained in Wyo. Stat. §§

33-27-123

(vi) and

33-38-113

(vi) because plaintiff alleged mental and emotional damages in this litigation by seeking damages for loss of enjoyment of life. Vahai v. Gertsch, 2020 WY 7, 455 P.3d 1218,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2020).

Psychologist-client privileges limited by §§

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

. —

The privileges created between psychologist-client and physician-patient by §

1-12-101

and this section are limited by the subsequent enactment of §§

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

, which set forth a procedure for ascertaining and correcting child abuse and neglect. In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998) (decided under former § 33-27-103).

Disciplinary complaint. —

It was not error to deny a practitioner access to a complainant's mental health information under this section or Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-38-113(a)(iii) as the complainant did not allege mental or emotional damages in underlying litigation, nor did she file a malpractice action against the practitioner. She merely filed a disciplinary complaint against him.
Greene v. State ex rel. Wyo. Bd. of Chiropractic Examiners, 2009 WY 42, 204 P.3d 285,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2009).

No exception. —

It was not error to deny a practitioner access to a complainant's mental health information under this section or Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-38-113(a)(iii) as the complainant did not allege mental or emotional damages in underlying litigation, nor did she file a malpractice action against the practitioner. She merely filed a disciplinary complaint against him.
Greene v. State ex rel. Wyo. Bd. of Chiropractic Examiners, 2009 WY 42, 204 P.3d 285,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2009).

Applied

in

Vit v. State, 909 P.2d 953,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Evidence —Recognition of a Federal Psychotherapist-Patient Privilege. Jaffee v. Redmond, 518 U.S. 1, 116 S. Ct. 1923, 135 L. Ed. 2d 337, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 3879 (1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 873 (1997).

§ 33-27-124.
Requirements for licensure; behavior analysis.

The board shall issue a license as a behavior analyst or an assistant behavior analyst to any applicant who files an application upon a form and in a manner as prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and who furnishes satisfactory evidence to the board of the applicant’s competence and of the following which evidence shall comply with rules of the board:

For licensure as a behavior analyst, the applicant holds a current certification as a board certified behavior analyst verified by the board with the certifying entity; or

For licensure as an assistant behavior analyst, the applicant holds a current certification as a board certified assistant behavior analyst verified by the board with the certifying entity.

A license may be issued to any person who is verified by the board to be currently licensed as a behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst and in good standing in another jurisdiction that has licensure requirements comparable to and who otherwise meets the requirements of this act.

Any person licensed under this section as an assistant behavior analyst may engage in the practice of behavior analysis only under the supervision of a licensed behavior analyst or licensed psychologist in compliance with the requirements of the certifying entity and as provided by rule of the board.

History.

2022 ch. 47, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

§ 33-27-125.
Exemptions; behavior analysis.

The following persons when practicing within the scope of their authority and their education and training may engage in acts included in the definition of the practice of behavior analysis under W.S. 33-27-113(a)(xiii) without being licensed as a behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst under this act:

Any member of another recognized profession who is licensed, certified or regulated under the laws of this state as defined in the rules of the board and is authorized to render services consistent with their professional training and code of ethics, provided that they do not represent themselves to be licensed behavior analysts or licensed assistant behavior analysts;

A psychologist licensed under this act or any person, as prescribed by rule of the board, acting under the psychologist’s authority and direction;

A behavior analyst, including an applied animal behaviorist and animal trainer, who practices exclusively with non-humans;

Any person who provides general behavior analysis services to an organization when the services are for the sole benefit of the organization and do not involve providing services directly to any individual person;

Any person while teaching behavior analysis or conducting behavior analytics research, provided that the teaching or research do not involve the direct delivery of behavior analysis services beyond the typical parameters of college or university instruction or applied research;

A matriculated college or university student or postdoctoral fellow whose applied behavior analysis activities are part of a defined program of study, course, practicum, internship or fellowship and are supervised by a behavior analyst licensed in this state or by a qualified faculty member as provided by rule of the board;

Any unlicensed person who is pursuing experience in applied behavior analysis consistent with the experience requirements of the certifying entity, provided such experience is supervised in accordance with the requirements of the certifying entity and as provided by rule of the board;

A behavior technician who delivers behavior analysis services under the supervision of a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst. A behavior technician shall not represent himself as a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst and shall only use titles that communicate his unlicensed status, such as “applied behavior analysis technician,” “behavior technician” or “tutor.” As used in this paragraph, “behavior technician” means a paraprofessional who practices under the supervision of a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst and who delivers services as assigned by the supervisor responsible for the technician’s work. The services that may be assigned to a behavior technician shall not include designing assessment or intervention plans or procedures;

A caregiver of a recipient of behavior analysis services who delivers behavior analysis services to the recipient under the authority and direction of a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst. The caregiver shall not represent themselves as a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst under this paragraph and shall deliver behavior analysis services only to the person who is receiving behavior analysis services from the licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst who is supervising the caregiver; or

Any person providing advice or counsel to a friend or relative in a nonprofessional and noncommercial setting and when no compensation is paid for the advice or counsel that is being provided.

History.

2022 ch. 47, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.